Illinois, session 104th, HB2947.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Gambling Act is amended by 5changing Section 9 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 10/9)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2409)7    Sec. 9. Occupational licenses. 8    (a) The Board may issue an occupational license to an 9applicant upon the payment of a non-refundable fee set by the 10Board, upon a determination by the Board that the applicant is 11eligible for an occupational license and upon payment of an 12annual license fee in an amount to be established. To be 13eligible for an occupational license, an applicant must:14        (1) be at least 21 years of age if the applicant will 15    perform any function involved in gaming by patrons. Any 16    applicant seeking an occupational license for a non-gaming 17    function shall be at least 18 years of age;18        (2) not have been convicted of a felony offense, a 19    violation of Article 28 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 20    Criminal Code of 2012, or a similar statute of any other 21    jurisdiction if the applicant will perform any function 22    involved in gaming by patrons;23        (2.5) not have been convicted of a crime, other than a   HB2947 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11840 LNS 21930 b1    crime described in item (2) of this subsection (a), 2    involving dishonesty or moral turpitude if the applicant 3    will perform any function involved in gaming by patrons, 4    except that the Board may, in its discretion, issue an 5    occupational license to a person who has been convicted of 6    a crime described in this item (2.5) more than 10 years 7    prior to his or her application and has not subsequently 8    been convicted of any other crime;9        (3) have demonstrated a level of skill or knowledge 10    which the Board determines to be necessary in order to 11    operate gambling aboard a riverboat, in a casino, or at an 12    organization gaming facility; and13        (4) have met standards for the holding of an 14    occupational license as adopted by rules of the Board. 15    Such rules shall provide that any person or entity seeking 16    an occupational license to manage gambling operations 17    under this Act shall be subject to background inquiries 18    and further requirements similar to those required of 19    applicants for an owners license. Furthermore, such rules 20    shall provide that each such entity shall be permitted to 21    manage gambling operations for only one licensed owner.22    (b) Each application for an occupational license shall be 23on forms prescribed by the Board and shall contain all 24information required by the Board. The applicant shall set 25forth in the application: whether he has been issued prior 26gambling related licenses; whether he has been licensed in any   HB2947 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11840 LNS 21930 b1other state under any other name, and, if so, such name and his 2age; and whether or not a permit or license issued to him in 3any other state has been suspended, restricted or revoked, 4and, if so, for what period of time.5    (c) Each applicant shall submit with his application, on 6forms provided by the Board, 2 sets of his fingerprints. The 7Board shall charge each applicant a fee set by the Illinois 8State Police to defray the costs associated with the search 9and classification of fingerprints obtained by the Board with 10respect to the applicant's application. These fees shall be 11paid into the State Police Services Fund. This subsection (c) 12does not apply to the non-gaming occupational identification 13badge issued under subsection (j). 14    (d) The Board may in its discretion refuse an occupational 15license to any person: (1) who is unqualified to perform the 16duties required of such applicant; (2) who fails to disclose 17or states falsely any information called for in the 18application; (3) who has been found guilty of a violation of 19this Act or whose prior gambling related license or 20application therefor has been suspended, restricted, revoked 21or denied for just cause in any other state; (4) who has a 22background, including a criminal record, reputation, habits, 23social or business associations, or prior activities, that 24poses a threat to the public interests of this State or to the 25security and integrity of gaming; or (5) for any other just 26cause. When considering criminal convictions of an applicant,   HB2947 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11840 LNS 21930 b1the Board shall consider the following factors:2        (1) the length of time since the conviction;3        (2) the number of convictions that appear on the 4    conviction record;5        (3) the nature and severity of the conviction and its 6    relationship to the safety and security of others or the 7    integrity of gaming;8        (4) the facts or circumstances surrounding the 9    conviction;10        (5) the age of the employee at the time of the 11    conviction; and12        (6) evidence of rehabilitation efforts.13    (e) The Board may suspend, revoke or restrict any 14occupational licensee: (1) for violation of any provision of 15this Act; (2) for violation of any of the rules and regulations 16of the Board; (3) for any cause which, if known to the Board, 17would have disqualified the applicant from receiving such 18license; or (4) for default in the payment of any obligation or 19debt due to the State of Illinois; or (5) for any other just 20cause.21    (f) A person who knowingly makes a false statement on an 22application is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.23    (g) Any license issued pursuant to this Section shall be 24valid for a period of one year from the date of issuance.25    (h) Nothing in this Act shall be interpreted to prohibit a 26licensed owner or organization gaming licensee from entering   HB2947 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 11840 LNS 21930 b1into an agreement with a public community college or a school 2approved under the Private Business and Vocational Schools Act 3of 2012 for the training of any occupational licensee. Any 4training offered by such a school shall be in accordance with a 5written agreement between the licensed owner or organization 6gaming licensee and the school.7    (i) Any training provided for occupational licensees may 8be conducted either at the site of the gambling facility or at 9a school with which a licensed owner or organization gaming 10licensee has entered into an agreement pursuant to subsection 11(h).12    (j) The Board shall not require individuals hired 13exclusively to perform functions that are not related in any 14way to gaming operations to hold an occupational license. The 15Board shall issue a non-gaming occupational identification 16badge upon submission of an application and payment of a 17nonrefundable annual fee set by the Board. To be eligible for a 18non-gaming occupational identification badge, the individual 19must be at least 18 years of age.20    The Board has the authority to rescind non-gaming 21occupational identification badges for any reasons provided 22under Section 9 of this Act and the Board's adopted rules. All 23individuals holding non-gaming occupational identification 24badges are subject to the jurisdiction of the Board and the 25Board's standards and adopted rules. 26(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-550, eff. 1-1-24.)   HB2947 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 11840 LNS 21930 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.